District of Columbia statutes.
38-2906.01

Repealed

Payments for District of Columbia Public Schools.

Repealed.

Mar, 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-207, § 107a
as added Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-348, § 101(d), 52 DCR 1991
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 4002(d), 57 DCR 181
Section 2(c) of D.C. Law 14-38 added § 38-2906.01 to read as follows:
“§ 38-2906.01. Payments.
“(a) Except as provided in subsection (b)(2) of this section, following the enactment of an act making appropriations for the District of Columbia each fiscal year, the Mayor shall provide to DCPS the full amount of its appropriation in accordance with standard procedures for independent agencies. The Mayor shall make payments to each public charter school from the escrow account established under section 2403 of the School Reform Act to a bank designated by each school. The annual payment shall be made in the form of four quarterly payments calculated in accordance with subsections (b), (c) and (d) of this section, provided; however, that the entire annual payment for facilities pursuant to section 109 shall be included in the first payment of the fiscal year and that any payment for new charter schools pursuant to section 2403 of the School Reform Act shall also be included in the first payment of the fiscal year. The first payment shall be made no later than July 15; subsequent payments shall be made no later than October 15, January 15, and April 15.
“(b)(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, each payment shall be one-fourth of each public charter school’s entitlement based on its October enrollment count. The basis of the July 15 and October 15 payments shall be the unaudited numbers contained in the reports submitted by the eligible chartering authorities under section 2402(a) of the School Reform Act. The basis of the January 15 and April 15 payments shall be the audited October enrollment numbers, provided that these amounts shall be adjusted in accordance with the provisions of subsection (c) of this section.
“(2) The payment of October 15, 2000 shall be 50% of each public charter school’s entitlement based on its unaudited October 5 enrollment count.
“(c) Payments shall not be reduced or delayed pending the conduct and results of the audit prescribed by section 107(e). If the audit finds that the number of verified resident students in enrollment at any public charter school differs from that on which its July 15 and October 15 payments were based, the Mayor shall recalculate the appropriate amount of subsequent payments accordingly, adjusting them by the amount of the discrepancy.
“(d) Payments for special education, limited English proficient students, and other add-on components of the Funding Formula shall be included in the quarterly payments to public charter schools. Payments shall reflect one-quarter of the annual per student amount for each add-on; provided, however, that add-ons for special education and limited English proficient students shall be added on a pro rata basis from the date on which a public charter school begins to provide add-on services for such students.
“(e) Prior to or concurrent with any payment made pursuant to this section, the Chief Financial Officer of the District of Columbia shall provide to each public charter school an accounting indicating what the payment is for and how it was calculated.”.
Section 6(b) of D.C. Law 14-38 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
Section 2(c) of D.C. Law 15-67 added a section to read as follows:
“Sec. 107a. Payments.
“(a) Except as provided in subsection (b)(2) of this section, following the enactment of an act making appropriations for the District of Columbia each fiscal year, the Mayor shall provide to DCPS the full amount of its appropriation in accordance with standard procedures for independent agencies. The Mayor shall make payments to each public charter school from the escrow account established under section 2403 of the School Reform Act to a bank designated by each school. The annual payment shall be made in the form of four equal quarterly payments calculated in accordance with subsections (b), (c) and (d) of this section, provided; however, that the entire annual payment for facilities pursuant to section 109 shall be included in the first payment of the fiscal year and that any payment for new charter schools pursuant to section 2403 of the School Reform Act shall also be included in the first payment of the fiscal year. The first payment shall be made no later than July 15; subsequent payments shall be made no later than October 15, January 15, and April 15.
“(b)(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, each payment shall be one-fourth of each public charter school’s entitlement based on its October enrollment count. The basis of the July 15 and October 15 payments shall be the unaudited numbers contained in the reports submitted by the eligible chartering authorities under section 2402(a) of the School Reform Act. The basis of the January 15 and April 15 payments shall be the audited October enrollment numbers, provided that these amounts shall be adjusted in accordance with the provisions of subsection (c) of this section.
“(2) The payment of October 15, 2000 shall be 50% of each public charter school’s entitlement based on its unaudited October 5 enrollment count.
“(c) Payments shall not be reduced or delayed pending the conduct and results of the audit prescribed by section 107(e). If the audit finds that the number of verified resident students in enrollment at any public charter school differs from that on which its July 15 and October 15 payments were based, the Mayor shall recalculate the appropriate amount of subsequent payments accordingly, adjusting them by the amount of the discrepancy.
“(d) Payments for special education, limited English proficient students, and other add-on components of the Funding Formula shall be included in the quarterly payments to public charter schools. Payments shall reflect one-quarter of the annual per student amount for each add-on; provided, however, that add-ons for special education and limited English proficient students shall be added on a pro rata basis from the date on which a public charter school begins to provide add-on services for such students.
“(e) Prior to or concurrent with any payment made pursuant to this section, the Chief Financial Officer of the District of Columbia shall provide to each public charter school an accounting indicating what the payment is for and how it was calculated.”
Section 6(b) of D.C. Law 15-67 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2(e) of the Uniform Per Student Funding Formula Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-485, December 18, 2000, 48 DCR 20).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section 38-2906.01, see § 2(e) of Uniform Per Student Funding Formula For Public Schools and Public Charter Schools Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-18, March 16, 2001, 48 DCR 2691).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2 of the Public School Enrollment Integrity Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-139, July 29, 2003, 50 DCR 6866).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2(c) of Public School Enrollment Integrity Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-174, October 6, 2003, 50 DCR 9181).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of Public School Enrollment Integrity Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-282, December 18, 2003, 51 DCR 191).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2(c) of Public School Enrollment Integrity Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-519, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8995).
For temporary (90 day) repeal, see § 4002(d) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-187, August